GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-additions.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8 [€éã]
!# CONTENT:     additional lexicon entries
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:   	PORTUGUESE 
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, C. Hagege 
!#
!# UPDATED:	19-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols
! main categories
+Adj 
+Adv
+Noun
+Prop 

! sub types
+Loc
+Profession
+Virtual
+Geo
+General
+Water_go
+Cardpoint
+Relative

! other features

+Masc +Fem +MF
+Sg +Pl +SP

+Comp +Sup

+Abbr +Acron


! special markers
(.)     ! optional dot
(-)     ! optional hyphen
[-]     ! hyphen or space

^]	! inflection marker

Definitions
  Upp =	[A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Ã|Ä|Á|À|É|È|Í|Ì|Î|Ó|Ò|Ö|Ú|Ù|Ü] ;
  Low =	[a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|ã|ä|á|à|é|è|í|ì|î|ó|ò|ö|ú|ù|ü] ;
  Char = [ Upp | Low ] ;
  Mod = Char+ [ %- Char+]* ;

  LBD = %^%] ;


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

LEXICON ROOT
CD+Noun+Abbr				MSP;		
CD-ROM+Noun+Abbr			MSP;		
CD+Noun+Abbr:cd				MSP;		
CD-ROM+Noun+Abbr:cd-rom			MSP;
Internet+Prop+Loc+Virtual		MSG;
Web+Prop+Loc+Virtual                    MSG;
Net+Prop+Loc+Virtual                    MSG;
e-mail+Prop+Loc+Virtual                 MSG;
artº(.)+Noun+Abbr		MSP;
nº(.)+Noun+Abbr			MSP;
liga^]+Noun					FSGPL;
associação^+Noun				FSGPL;
bandeja^]+Noun					FSGPL;
ribeira^]+Noun+Geo+Water_go+General		FSGPL;
riachuelo^]+Noun+Geo+Water_go+General		MSGPL;
iguarapé^]+Noun+Geo+Water_go+General		MSGPL;
sanga^]+Noun+Geo+Water_go+General		FSGPL;
papi^]+Noun+Relative				MSGPL;
mami^]+Noun+Relative				FSGPL;
mamãe^]+Noun+Relative				FSGPL;
tio-avô^]+Noun+Relative				MSGPL;
tia-avó^]+Noun+Relative				FSGPL;
trisavô^]+Noun+Relative				MSGPL;
trisavó^]+Noun+Relative				FSGPL;
tetravô^]+Noun+Relative				MSGPL;
tetravó^]+Noun+Relative				FSGPL;
trisneto^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
trisneta^]+Noun+Relative			FSGPL;
meia-irmã^]+Noun+Relative			FSGPL;
meio-irmão^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
padrasto^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
sobrinho-neto^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
sobrinha-neta^]+Noun+Relative			FSGPL;
irmã-gémea^]+Noun+Relative			FSGPL;
irmão-gémeo^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
padrinho^]+Noun+Relative			MSGPL;
acupun(c)tor^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
acupun(c)tora^]+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;
agulhador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
agulheiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
ajuntador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
alfaite^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
almirante^]-de-esquadra+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
andebolista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
anfibiólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
anfibióloga^]+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;
anfibiologista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
aquacultor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
argumentista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
ascensionista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
astrobiólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
astrobiólogo^]+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;
bacteriólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
bacteriólogo^]+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;
bagagista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
bandarilheiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
barman+Noun+Profession				MSG;	! ??
barmaid+Noun+Profession				FSG;
basquetebolista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
bataneiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
bate-chapas+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
baterista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
betonador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
biblicista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
bibliólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
biliotecário^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
biografista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
bioquímico^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
bordadora+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
broquista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
calafate+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
cançonetista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
capista^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
capitão^]-de-corveta+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
capitão^]-de-fragata+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
capitão^]-de-mar-e-guerra+Noun+Profession	MSGPL;
carcinologista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
cartonageiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
cartoonista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
catequista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
cenógrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
ciclomotorista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
cimenteiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
clarista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
climatólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
colonista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
contorcionista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
cordoeiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
cosmólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
craniologista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
crasiologista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
criminalista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
criptólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
cronólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
crustaceóloga+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
debuxador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
descascador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
desgarrador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
desinfetador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
desmeadeiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
dietista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
documentarista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
dramaturgista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
editorialista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
el-rei+Noun+Profession				MSG;	! ??
electromecânico^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
embalador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
encadernador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
encolador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
enformador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
enólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
envernizador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
escafandrista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
escolhedor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
esfrasgista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
esmerilador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
estagiário^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
estaticista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
estucador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
etimólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
etnólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
fandanguista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
ficcionista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
fiandeiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
filatelista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
filósofa+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
fisiologista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
floricultor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
forjador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
fotocompositor^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
fotogrametrista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
fotojornalista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
fundidor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
funileiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
gastrenterologista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
general^]-de-brigada+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
general^]-de-divisão^]+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
general^]-de-exército^]+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
geofísico^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
gomador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
halterofilista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
harpista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
hidrógrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
homeopata+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
hoquista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
ilusionista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
impregnador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
instrumentalista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
juíz+Noun+Profession				MSG;	! ??
ladrilhador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
lapidador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
lavador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
licorista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
lixador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
magarefe+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
maleiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
mandarete+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
maquetista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
marechal^]-do-ar+Noun+Profession		MSGPL;
mecânico^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
metalomecânico^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
metereologista^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
mineralogista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
modelista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
musicólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
novelador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
obstectra+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
obstetra+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
optometrista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
pagador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
pantogravador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
penteador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
percheiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
pinceleiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
planificador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
plastificador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
posticeiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
quadrador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
rabaneador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
radioterapeuta+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
recauchutador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
retificador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
remetedor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
retorcedor^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
riscador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
salsicheiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
serígrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
sexóloga+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;	! ??
sexólogo^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
sobrescriteiro^]+Noun+Profession		MFSGPL;
soldador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
sondadore+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
sonoplasta+Noun+Profession			MSG;	! ??
suboficial^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
tampógrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
tintureiro^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
tipógrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MSGPL;
topógrafa^]+Noun+Profession			FSGPL;
transportador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
trintanário^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
vibradorista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
virologista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
visualizador^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
voleibolista^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
xerígrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
zincógrafo^]+Noun+Profession			MFSGPL;
septentrional^]+Noun			MFSGPL;
